Connecticut, session 2026, HB05004.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 17a-114 of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section, (1) "approval" or "approved" means that a
person has been approved to adopt or provide foster care by a child-
placing agency licensed pursuant to section 17a-149, (2) "licensed"
means a person holds a license to provide foster care issued by the
Department of Children and Families, (3) "fictive kin caregiver" means
a person who is twenty-one years of age or older and who is unrelated
to a child by birth, adoption or marriage but who has an emotionally
significant relationship with such child or such child's family amounting
to a familial relationship, and (4) "emergency placement" means the
placement of a child by the Department of Children and Families in the
home of a relative or fictive kin caregiver as a result of the sudden
unavailability of such child's primary caretaker.
(b) (1) No child in the custody of the Commissioner of Children and
Families shall be placed in foster care with any person, unless (A) (i)

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
such person is licensed for such purpose by the department or the
Department of Developmental Services pursuant to the provisions of
section 17a-227, (ii) such person's home is approved by a child-placing
agency licensed by the commissioner pursuant to section 17a-149, or (iii)
such person has received approval as provided in this section, and (B)
on and after January 1, 2017, for a child twelve years of age or older,
such child has received a foster family profile in accordance with the
provisions of section 17a-114e. For the purposes of this section, any
prospective adoptive parent shall be licensed by the department. Upon
the denial of an initial license, the department shall disclose to the
applicant, in writing, the reason for such denial. Any applicant denied
an initial license by the department may appeal such denial to the
commissioner, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner,
not later than thirty days after such denial. Not later than sixty days after
the making of such appeal, the commissioner shall grant such license or
affirm such denial in writing. The commissioner shall adopt regulations,
in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, to establish the licensing
procedures and standards.
(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this subdivision,
the commissioner shall require each applicant for licensure or approval
pursuant to this section and any person eighteen years of age or older
living in the household of such applicant to submit to state and national
criminal history records checks prior to issuing a license or approval to
such applicant to accept placement of a child for purposes of foster care
or adoption. Such criminal history records checks shall be conducted in
accordance with section 29-17a. The commissioner shall check the (i)
state child abuse and neglect registry established pursuant to section
17a-101k for the name of such applicant and for the name of any person
eighteen years of age or older living in the household of such applicant,
and (ii) child abuse and neglect registry in any state in which such
applicant or person resided in the preceding five years for the name of
such applicant or person.
Public Act No. 26-26 2 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
(B) If an applicant for licensure or approval or any person eighteen
years of age or older living in the household of such applicant has
submitted to the state and national criminal history records checks
described in subsection (c) of this section within the previous twelve-
month period, the commissioner shall not require such applicant or
person to submit to the state and national criminal history records
checks described in subparagraph (A) of this subdivision in connection
with the issuance of a license or approval.
(3) The commissioner shall require each individual licensed or
approved pursuant to this section and any person eighteen years of age
or older living in the household of such individual to submit to state and
national criminal history records checks prior to renewing a license or
approval for any individual providing foster care or adopting. Such
criminal history records checks shall be conducted in accordance with
section 29-17a. Prior to such renewal, the commissioner shall check the
(A) state child abuse and neglect registry established pursuant to section
17a-101k for the name of such applicant and for the name of any person
eighteen years of age or older living in the household of such applicant,
and (B) child abuse and neglect registry in any state in which such
applicant or person resided in the preceding five years for the name of
such applicant or person.
(4) The commissioner shall comply with any request to check the
child abuse and neglect registry established pursuant to section 17a-
101k made by the child welfare agency of another state.
(c) (1) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (b) of this
section, the commissioner [may] shall make an emergency placement of
a child with a relative or fictive kin caregiver who has not been issued a
license or approval, [when] if such emergency placement is in the best
interests of the child, provided a satisfactory home visit is conducted
and a basic assessment of the family is completed. When the
commissioner makes such an emergency placement, the commissioner
Public Act No. 26-26 3 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
shall (A) request a criminal justice agency to perform a federal name-
based criminal history search of such relative or fictive kin caregiver and
each person eighteen years of age or older residing in the home, and (B)
check the state child abuse and neglect registry established pursuant to
section 17a-101k for the name of such relative or fictive kin caregiver
and each person eighteen years of age or older residing in the home. The
results of such name-based search shall be provided to the
commissioner.
(2) Not later than ten calendar days after a name-based search is
performed pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, the
commissioner shall request the State Police Bureau of Identification to
perform a state and national criminal history records checks of such
relative or fictive kin caregiver and each person eighteen years of age or
older residing in the home, in accordance with section 29-17a. Such
criminal history records checks shall be deemed as required by this
section for the purposes of section 29-17a and the commissioner may
request that such criminal history records checks be performed in
accordance with subsection (c) of said section. The results of such
criminal history records checks shall be provided to the commissioner.
If any person refuses to provide fingerprints or other positive
identifying information for the purposes of such criminal history
records checks when requested, the commissioner shall immediately
remove the child from the home.
(3) If the commissioner denies an emergency placement with a
relative or fictive kin caregiver or removes a child from such home based
on the results of a federal name-based criminal history search performed
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, the person whose name-
based search was the basis for such denial or removal may contest such
denial or removal by requesting that state and national criminal history
records checks be performed pursuant to subdivision (2) of this
subsection. Upon the denial of an emergency placement with a relative
Public Act No. 26-26 4 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
or fictive kin caregiver or removal of a child from such relative or fictive
kin caregiver's home, the commissioner shall document, in writing, the
reason for such denial or removal. If a child is placed in the home of a
person who is not a relative or fictive kin caregiver, the commissioner
shall confirm, in writing, that such placement, rather than placement
with a relative or fictive kin caregiver, serves the best interests of such
child.
(4) Any such relative or fictive kin caregiver who accepts placement
of a child shall be subject to licensure by the commissioner, pursuant to
regulations adopted by the commissioner in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54, to implement the provisions of this section or
approval by a child-placing agency licensed pursuant to section 17a-149.
The commissioner may grant a waiver from such regulations, including
any standard regarding separate bedrooms or room-sharing
arrangements, for a child placed with a relative or fictive kin caregiver,
on a case-by-case basis, if such placement is otherwise in the best
interests of such child, provided no procedure or standard that is safety-
related may be so waived. The commissioner shall document, in writing,
the reason for granting any waiver from such regulations.
(d) Any individual who has been licensed or approved to adopt or
provide foster care and any relative or fictive kin caregiver with whom
a child has been placed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall
apply a reasonable and prudent parent standard, as defined in
subsection (a) of section 17a-114d, on behalf of the child.
Sec. 2. Subsection (b) of section 46b-129 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) If it appears from the specific allegations of the petition and other
verified affirmations of fact accompanying the petition and application,
or subsequent thereto, that there is reasonable cause to believe that (1)
Public Act No. 26-26 5 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
the child or youth is suffering from serious physical illness or serious
physical injury or is in immediate physical danger from the child's or
youth's surroundings, and (2) as a result of said conditions, the child's
or youth's safety is endangered and immediate removal from such
surroundings is necessary to ensure the child's or youth's safety, the
court shall either (A) issue an order to the parents or other person
having responsibility for the care of the child or youth to appear at such
time as the court may designate to determine whether the court should
vest the child's or youth's temporary care and custody in a person
related to the child or youth by blood or marriage, a fictive kin caregiver,
as defined in section 17a-114, as amended by this act, or [in] some other
person or suitable agency pending disposition of the petition, or (B)
issue an order ex parte vesting the child's or youth's temporary care and
custody in a person related to the child or youth by blood or marriage,
a fictive kin caregiver or [in] some other person or suitable agency. A
preliminary hearing on any ex parte custody order or order to appear
issued by the court shall be held not later than ten days after the issuance
of such order. The service of such orders may be made by any officer
authorized by law to serve process, or by any probation officer
appointed in accordance with section 46b-123, investigator from the
Department of Administrative Services, state or local police officer or
indifferent person. Such orders shall include a conspicuous notice to the
respondent written in clear and simple language containing at least the
following information: (i) That the order contains allegations that
conditions in the home have endangered the safety and welfare of the
child or youth; (ii) that a hearing will be held on the date on the form;
(iii) that the hearing is the opportunity to present the parents' position
concerning the alleged facts; (iv) that an attorney will be appointed for
parents who cannot afford an attorney; (v) that such parents may apply
for a court-appointed attorney by going in person to the court address
on the form and are advised to go as soon as possible in order for the
attorney to prepare for the hearing; (vi) that such parents, or a person
having responsibility for the care and custody of the child or youth, may
Public Act No. 26-26 6 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
request the Commissioner of Children and Families to investigate
placing the child or youth with a person related to the child or youth by
blood or marriage or a fictive kin caregiver who might serve as a
licensed foster parent or temporary custodian for such child or youth.
The commissioner shall investigate any relative or [relatives] fictive kin
caregiver proposed to serve as a licensed foster parent or temporary
custodian for such child or youth prior to the preliminary hearing and
provide a preliminary report to the court at such hearing as to such
relative's or [relatives'] caregiver's suitability and any potential barriers
to licensing such relative or [relatives] caregiver as a foster parent or
parents or granting temporary custody of such child or youth to such
[relative or relatives] caregiver; and (vii) that if such parents have any
questions concerning the case or appointment of counsel, any such
parent is advised to go to the court or call the clerk's office at the court
as soon as possible. Upon application for appointed counsel, the court
shall promptly determine eligibility and, if the respondent is eligible,
promptly appoint counsel. The expense for any temporary care and
custody shall be paid by the town in which such child or youth is at the
time residing, and such town shall be reimbursed for such expense by
the town found liable for the child's or youth's support, except that
where a state agency has filed a petition pursuant to the provisions of
subsection (a) of this section, the agency shall pay such expense. The
agency shall give primary consideration to placing the child or youth
with a relative or fictive kin caregiver. If such placement with a relative
or fictive kin caregiver is denied, the agency shall give secondary
consideration to placing the child or youth in the town where such child
or youth resides. The agency shall file in writing with the clerk of the
court the reasons for placing the child or youth in a particular placement
with a person other than a relative or fictive kin caregiver or outside the
town where the child or youth resides, as applicable. If such child or
youth is placed with a person other than a relative or fictive kin
caregiver, such writing shall include confirmation that the placement
selected for such child or youth, rather than placement with a relative
Public Act No. 26-26 7 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
or fictive kin caregiver, serves the best interests of such child or youth.
Upon issuance of an ex parte order, the court shall provide to the
commissioner and the parent or guardian specific steps necessary for
each to take to address the ex parte order for the parent or guardian to
retain or regain custody of the child or youth. Upon the issuance of such
order, or not later than sixty days after the issuance of such order, the
court shall make a determination whether the Department of Children
and Families made reasonable efforts to keep the child or youth with his
or her parents or guardian prior to the issuance of such order and, if
such efforts were not made, whether such reasonable efforts were not
possible, taking into consideration the child's or youth's best interests,
including the child's or youth's health and safety. Any person or agency
in which the temporary care and custody of a child or youth is vested
under this section shall have the following rights and duties regarding
the child or youth: (I) The obligation of care and control; (II) the
authority to make decisions regarding emergency medical,
psychological, psychiatric or surgical treatment; and (III) such other
rights and duties that the court having jurisdiction may order.
Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section,
"caregiver" means a relative or fictive kin caregiver, as defined in section
17a-114 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, who has accepted
emergency placement of a child pursuant to subsection (c) of section
17a-114 of the general statutes, as amended by this act.
(b) There is established a grant program to provide grant payments
to caregivers for clothing, food, safety-related purchases and other
necessities for children upon the placement of such children with such
caregivers by the Commissioner of Children and Families.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Children and
Families shall develop a formula for the distribution of such grant
payments, which formula shall include a maximum grant payment of
six hundred twenty-five dollars to any caregiver, and guidelines for the
Public Act No. 26-26 8 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
appropriate expenditure of grant payments.
(d) Each caregiver who receives a grant payment under this section
shall file an expenditure report with the Commissioner of Children and
Families at such time and in such manner as the commissioner
prescribes. Each such caregiver shall refund to the department any
amounts not expended in accordance with the guidelines developed by
the commissioner pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.
(e) Not later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
Commissioner of Children and Families shall submit a report to the
Child Welfare Policy and Oversight Committee, established pursuant to
section 18 of this act, and, in accordance with the provisions of section
11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to children.
Such report shall include, for the preceding year, (1) the number of grant
payments provided, (2) the amount of each such grant payment, and (3)
the length of each such placement that has concluded.
Sec. 4. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section, (1)
"after school program" means a program that takes place after regular
school hours and provides educational, enrichment and recreational
activities for children in grades kindergarten to twelve, inclusive, (2)
"caregiver" means a relative or fictive kin caregiver, as defined in section
17a-114 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, who has accepted
emergency placement of a child pursuant to subsection (c) of section
17a-114 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, or a caregiver as
defined in section 17a-126 of the general statutes, and (3) "child care
service" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-131k of the
general statutes.
(b) There is established a grant program to provide grant payments
to caregivers for all or a portion of costs associated with after school
programs and child care services for children placed in the care of such
Public Act No. 26-26 9 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
caregivers by the Commissioner of Children and Families.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Children and
Families shall develop (1) an application process, (2) eligibility criteria
for caregivers, (3) guidelines for the appropriate expenditure of grant
payments by caregivers, and (4) a formula for the distribution of such
grant payments, which formula shall include the maximum grant
payment available to any caregiver, provided not more than fifty per
cent of the total funds available in any fiscal year for such grant program
shall be provided for costs associated with after school programs and
not more than fifty per cent of such funds shall be provided for costs
associated with child care services. Priority for such grant payments
shall be given to caregivers who are eligible for foster care maintenance
payments or a guardianship subsidy but have not yet received an initial
payment or subsidy.
(d) Each caregiver who receives a grant payment under this section
shall file an expenditure report with the Commissioner of Children and
Families at such time and in such manner as the commissioner
prescribes. Each such caregiver shall refund to the department any
amounts not expended in accordance with the guidelines developed by
the commissioner pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.
(e) Not later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
Commissioner of Children and Families shall submit a report to the
Child Welfare Policy and Oversight Committee, established pursuant to
section 18 of this act, and, in accordance with the provisions of section
11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to children.
Such report shall include, for the preceding year, the (1) number of
applications received by the department for grant payments for costs
associated with (A) after school programs, and (B) child care services,
and (2) total number of grant payments and the amount of each such
grant payment provided for (A) after school programs, and (B) child
Public Act No. 26-26 10 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
care services.
Sec. 5. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section,
"relevant field" means social work, applied sociology, child
development, child welfare, clinical psychology, counseling, human
development and family studies, human services, marriage and family
therapy, nursing, social services, education and criminal justice.
(b) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Department of Children and
Families, in consultation with institutions of higher education in the
state, shall establish a prospective social worker internship program that
includes opportunities for internship experiences, job shadowing,
support and coaching, and offers participants insight into the
professional challenges and rewards associated with social work over
the course of not less than one academic semester. The department shall
(1) establish (A) an application process and criteria for acceptance in
such program, which criteria shall include, but need not be limited to, a
requirement that participants are enrolled in a bachelor's or master's
degree program in a relevant field, and (B) criteria for the selection of
mentors who are employed by the department as social workers, and (2)
recruit such employees to participate as mentors in the program.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Department of Children and
Families shall establish a first-year social worker mentorship program
for newly hired social workers employed by the department. Such
program shall include opportunities for job shadowing, support and
coaching during each participant's first year of employment as a social
worker by the department. The department shall establish (1) an
application process and criteria for acceptance in such program, and (2)
criteria for the selection of experienced social workers employed by the
department to serve as mentors, and recruit such employees to
participate as mentors in the program.
(d) The Department of Children and Families (1) shall pay a stipend
Public Act No. 26-26 11 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
to each intern and mentor who successfully completes the internship or
mentorship program described in subsections (b) and (c) of this section,
and (2) may pay a stipend to each newly hired social worker who
successfully completes the mentorship program described in subsection
(c) of this section.
(e) Not later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
Commissioner of Children and Families shall submit a report to the
Child Welfare Policy and Oversight Committee, established pursuant to
section 18 of this act, and, in accordance with the provisions of section
11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to children.
Such report shall include, for the preceding year, the (1) number of
participants in the internship and mentorship programs described in
subsections (b) and (c) of this section, (2) the cost of each such program,
(3) whether or not adequate resources have been allocated to each such
program, and (4) recruitment and retention statistics amongst
participants.
Sec. 6. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Not later than January 1, 2028,
the Commissioner of Children and Families, in consultation with the
Commissioner of Mental Health and Addiction Services, shall develop
and provide a mandatory educational training program for employees
of the Department of Children and Families concerning (1) perinatal
mood and anxiety disorders, and (2) trauma-informed, nonstigmatizing
practices for interacting with individuals suffering from such disorders.
Such training program shall (A) include guidance to such employees
concerning such disorders and practices, and (B) be offered not less than
once every six months thereafter. Each person employed by the
department shall complete such training program at least once.
Employees hired prior to January 1, 2028, shall complete such training
program not later than December 31, 2028. Employees hired on or after
January 1, 2028, shall complete such training not later than one year after
Public Act No. 26-26 12 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
beginning such employment.
Sec. 7. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Not later than January 1, 2028,
the Commissioner of Children and Families shall, in consultation with
the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection and the
executive director of the Commission on Women, Children, Seniors,
Equity and Opportunity, established pursuant to section 2-127 of the
general statutes, develop and provide a mandatory educational training
program for employees of the Department of Children and Families
concerning human trafficking and trauma-informed, nonstigmatizing
practices for interacting with child and adult victims of human
trafficking. Such training program shall (1) include guidance to such
employees concerning such practices, and (2) be offered not less than
once every six months thereafter. Each person employed by the
department shall complete such training program at least once.
Employees hired prior to January 1, 2028, shall complete such training
program not later than December 31, 2028. Employees hired on or after
January 1, 2028, shall complete such training not later than one year after
beginning such employment.
Sec. 8. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Not later than January 1, 2028,
the Commissioner of Children and Families shall develop and provide
a mandatory educational training program for employees of the
Department of Children and Families concerning cultural sensitivity in
the delivery of the department's services and implicit bias, as defined in
section 19a-490u of the general statutes. Such training shall (1) include
guidance to such employees concerning such issues, and (2) be offered
not less than once every six months thereafter. Each person employed
by the department shall complete such training program not less than
once every two years. Employees hired prior to January 1, 2028, shall
initially complete such training program not later than December 31,
2028. Employees hired on or after January 1, 2028, shall initially
complete such training not later than one year after beginning such
Public Act No. 26-26 13 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
employment.
Sec. 9. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section,
"postsecondary education" means any program that leads to an
academic degree or certification in a vocation or trade.
(b) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Department of Children and
Families shall establish a postsecondary education grant program for
the purpose of providing grant payments to fund the postsecondary
education of youths (1) adopted through the department's foster care
program on or after January 1, 2005, and prior to turning eighteen years
of age, and (2) committed to the department who consent to remain in
the care of the Commissioner of Children and Families upon reaching
eighteen years of age pursuant to section 46b-129 of the general statutes,
as amended by this act. The department shall establish (A) an
application process, (B) a list of postsecondary education programs
approved by the department, (C) a formula for the distribution of such
grant payments, and (D) eligibility criteria for such youths. No such
youth shall participate in the program after such youth reaches twenty-
one years of age, except that the commissioner may permit any youth
that enrolled in the program prior to turning twenty-one years of age to
continue to participate until such youth turns twenty-four years of age
or completes such youth's postsecondary education program,
whichever occurs earlier. The department shall require any youth
participating in the program to complete for each year such youth is
enrolled in postsecondary education, as a condition to such
participation, the Free Application for Federal Student Aid and
applications for any appropriate scholarships and grants, including, but
not limited to, through any scholarship application portal administered
by the provider of such postsecondary education.
(c) Not later than July 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Children and
Families shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of
Public Act No. 26-26 14 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to children.
Such report shall include a description of the status of the postsecondary
education grant program established pursuant to this section, including,
but not limited to, (1) the number of applications to such program
received by the Department of Children and Families to date, (2) the
number of applicants accepted to participate in the program to date, and
(3) any challenges the department encountered in implementing the
program.
(d) Not later than January 1, 2028, the Commissioner of Children and
Families shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committees of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to children,
higher education, appropriations and government oversight, and the
Auditors of Public Accounts. Such report shall include, but need not be
limited to, information concerning (1) the number of applicants to such
program and any similar program offered by the Department of
Children and Families, in each year any such program was offered, (2)
the number of applicants that received a grant payment under such
program or any such similar program, in each year any such program
was offered, (3) the total amount of grant payments provided pursuant
to such program and any such similar program, in each year any such
program was offered, and the amount of each individual grant in each
such year, (4) the average amount of each grant payment provided
pursuant to such program and any such similar program, per student
annually and per student over the duration of such students'
participation in any such program, (5) the specific postsecondary
education programs attended by participants in such program during
the prior year, including the names of the institutions offering such
programs and the degrees toward which participants are working, (6)
the percentage of participants who have completed a postsecondary
education program while participating in such program and any such
similar program, (7) the number of participants who have requested to
Public Act No. 26-26 15 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
remain in such program or any such similar program after reaching
twenty-one years of age, and the number of participants who have been
approved by the department to do so, (8) the reasons the department
has provided applicants to such program, and any such similar
program, for denying such applicants from participating in such
programs, (9) the reasons the department has provided participants in
such program, and any such similar program, for denying such
participants' requests to remain in such programs after reaching twenty-
one years of age, (10) the length of time any such similar program has
existed pursuant to department policy, and (11) demographic data
pertaining to participants in such program and any such similar
program.
Sec. 10. (Effective October 1, 2026) Not later than July 1, 2028, the
Auditors of Public Accounts shall conduct a performance audit of the
postsecondary education grant program established pursuant to section
9 of this act. Said auditors shall conduct such performance audit in
accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards or
by another method said auditors deem appropriate. Said auditors shall
submit a report, in accordance with section 11-4a of the general statutes,
to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to children, higher education,
appropriations and government oversight. Such report shall include,
but need not be limited to, (1) such audit; (2) information concerning (A)
the number of applicants to such program and any similar program
offered by the Department of Children and Families, in each year any
such program was offered, (B) the number of applicants that received a
grant payment under such program or any such similar program, in
each year any such program was offered, (C) the total amount of grant
payments provided pursuant to such program and any such similar
program, in each year any such program was offered, and the amount
of each individual grant in each such year, (D) the average amount of
each grant payment provided pursuant to such program and any such
Public Act No. 26-26 16 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
similar program, per student annually and per student over the
duration of such students' participation in any such program, (E) the
specific postsecondary education programs attended by participants in
such program during the prior year, including the names of the
institutions offering such programs and the degrees toward which
participants are working, (F) the percentage of participants who have
completed a postsecondary education program while participating in
such program and any such similar program, (G) the number of
participants who have requested to remain in such program or any such
similar program after reaching twenty-one years of age, and the number
of participants who have been approved by the department to do so, (H)
the reasons the department has provided applicants to such program,
and any such similar program, for denying such applicants from
participating in such programs, (I) the reasons the department has
provided participants in such program, and any such similar program,
for denying such participants' requests to remain in such programs after
reaching twenty-one years of age, (J) the length of time any such similar
program has existed pursuant to department policy, and (K)
demographic data pertaining to participants in such program and any
such similar program; and (3) any recommendations for improving the
administrative efficiency or effectiveness of such program.
Sec. 11. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Not later than January 1, 2027,
the Department of Children and Families shall establish an Internet web
site, which may be within the department's Internet web site, that
includes the following:
(1) A public, online dashboard to provide real-time information
concerning the department's administration of and performance with
respect to the state-wide program of services described in section 17a-3
of the general statutes. Such information shall include, but need not be
limited to, the information identified by the working group established
pursuant to section 12 of this act and each annual report submitted
Public Act No. 26-26 17 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
pursuant to sections 3, 4 and 5 of this act. Such dashboard shall (A) be
integrated with any electronic data collection and tracking tools utilized
by the department to ensure that such information is consistently and
continually updated, and (B) present such information in a manner that
permits users to access and understand such information without
specialized knowledge or training.
(2) Information for the public concerning offices, programs and
services administered and offered by the department, including, but not
limited to, the Office of Community Relations, housing and
homelessness programs, the Careline established pursuant to section
17a-103a of the general statutes and text message programs.
(3) Information concerning the identification of child abuse and
neglect and how to report child abuse and neglect to the department.
(4) The educational training program developed pursuant to section
17a-101 of the general statutes, in a video format that members of the
public may access without creating a username or password for use on
such Internet web site, and any accompanying training materials.
Sec. 12. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a working
group to identify information to be included on the online dashboard
established pursuant to section 11 of this act concerning the Department
of Children and Families' administration of and performance with
respect to the state-wide program of services described in section 17a-3
of the general statutes.
(b) The working group shall consist of the following members: (1)
Members of the General Assembly, as designated by the chairpersons of
the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to children; (2) the ranking members of
the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to children, or their designees; (3) the
Public Act No. 26-26 18 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
Commissioner of Children and Families, or the commissioner's
designee; and (4) any individuals such chairpersons deem relevant and
necessary to carry out the duties of the working group.
(c) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to children
shall serve as administrative staff of the working group.
(d) Not later than October 1, 2026, the working group shall submit a
report on its findings, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to children. The
working group shall terminate on the date that it submits such report or
October 1, 2026, whichever is later.
Sec. 13. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) The parent or guardian
of a child who (1) is the subject of an investigation conducted pursuant
to section 17a-101g of the general statutes, as amended by this act, (2) is
under protective supervision, as defined in section 17a-93 of the general
statutes, (3) is receiving protective services, as defined in section 17a-93
of the general statutes, or (4) resides with a child described in
subdivisions (1) to (3), inclusive, of this subsection, shall notify the
Commissioner of Children and Families, in a form and manner
prescribed by the commissioner, if such child will be removed from the
state for a period exceeding fourteen consecutive days. Such notification
shall be provided not less than forty-eight hours prior to any such
removal, and include the (A) address of each location at which such
child will sleep during such removal, and (B) duration of such removal.
If the duration of any such removal is extended, such parent or guardian
shall notify the commissioner, in a form and manner prescribed by the
commissioner, as soon as is practicable.
(b) Upon the (1) removal from the state by the parent or guardian of
a child described in subsection (a) of this section for a period exceeding
Public Act No. 26-26 19 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
fourteen consecutive days, where notification has not been provided
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, or (2) extension of the duration
of any removal by a parent or guardian where notification has not been
provided pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the Commissioner
of Children and Families shall (A) attempt to contact a parent, guardian
or other family member of such child on three consecutive days
following such removal or extension, to ascertain such child's location,
if unknown, and evaluate such child's safety, except that the
commissioner may discontinue efforts to contact such parent, guardian
or other family member if contact is made during such three-day period,
and (B) if such child's location is known, (i) contact the child welfare or
law enforcement agency for the jurisdiction in which such child is
located and request that such agency conduct an in-person visit to such
child's location for the purpose of evaluating such child's safety, (ii)
follow up with such child welfare or law enforcement agency on three
consecutive days following such request to determine whether such
visit was conducted and discuss any findings, except that the
commissioner may discontinue efforts to follow up with such agency if
the commissioner determines such visit was conducted during such
three-day period, and (iii) conduct an in-person visit to evaluate such
child's safety or, if such in-person visit is not feasible, attempt to conduct
a visit by means of a video conferencing platform for the purpose of
evaluating such child's safety. The commissioner shall document in
writing all attempts to contact and communicate with any child, parent,
guardian, family member, child welfare agency or law enforcement
agency pursuant to this subsection.
(c) The provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall not apply
where the Commissioner of Children and Families is not notified of the
removal of a child described in subsection (a) of this section until after
such child's return to the state.
(d) The Commissioner of Children and Families shall provide written
Public Act No. 26-26 20 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
notice of the provisions of this section to the parents or guardians of
each child described in subsection (a) of this section.
(e) The Commissioner of Children and Families may (1) undertake
the actions described in subsection (b) of this section with respect to any
child described in subsection (a) of this section who has been removed
from the state for a period of fourteen or fewer consecutive days, or (2)
require the parent or guardian of any such child to notify the
commissioner if such child will be removed from the state for a period
of fourteen or fewer consecutive days.
Sec. 14. (NEW) (Effective from passage) Evidence that the parent or
guardian of a child has voluntarily sought treatment from or is being
voluntarily treated by a mental health professional for mental health
concerns, including, but not limited to, a perinatal mood or anxiety
disorder, shall not form the sole basis for any action or proceeding by
the Department of Children and Families, provided nothing in this
section shall preclude any action or proceeding by such department
based on harm or risk of harm to a child or the use of information
concerning such treatment in any action or proceeding where
authorized.
Sec. 15. Subsection (b) of section 17a-101g of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(b) The Commissioner of Children and Families shall establish
protocols for the investigation of and response to reports of child abuse
or neglect of children from birth to three years of age. Such protocols
shall include, but need not be limited to, (1) appropriate supervision of
the case, (2) appropriate visitation by department personnel to such
children, (3) documentation of case activities relevant to the safety and
well-being of such children, and (4) a case supervision tool specific to
the unique needs and risk status of children from birth to three years of
Public Act No. 26-26 21 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
age. All investigations of a report of child abuse or neglect pursuant to
this section shall include a home visit at which the child and any siblings
are observed, if appropriate, a determination of the nature, extent and
cause or causes of the reported abuse or neglect, a determination of the
person or persons suspected to be responsible for such abuse or neglect,
the name, age and condition of other children residing in the same
household and an evaluation of the parents and the home. During any
such observation, department personnel shall consider any opinions
expressed by the child or other children residing in the household
concerning whether such child was abused or neglected. The report of
such investigation shall be in writing. The investigation shall also
include, but not be limited to, a review of criminal conviction
information concerning the person or persons alleged to be responsible
for such abuse or neglect and previous allegations of abuse or neglect
relating to the child or other children residing in the household or
relating to family violence. After an investigation into a report of abuse
or neglect has been completed, the commissioner shall determine, based
upon a standard of reasonable cause, whether a child has been abused
or neglected, as defined in section 46b-120. If the commissioner
determines that abuse or neglect has occurred, the commissioner shall
also determine whether: (A) There is an identifiable person responsible
for such abuse or neglect; and (B) such identifiable person poses a risk
to the health, safety or well-being of children and should be
recommended by the commissioner for placement on the child abuse
and neglect registry established pursuant to section 17a-101k. If the
commissioner has made the determinations in subparagraphs (A) and
(B) of this subsection, the commissioner shall issue notice of a
recommended finding to the person suspected to be responsible for such
abuse or neglect in accordance with section 17a-101k. If the child is
represented by an attorney or guardian ad litem, the commissioner shall
notify the child's attorney or guardian ad litem in writing not less than
five days prior to the date of any meeting in which the department is
considering removing the child from the household, except, if the
Public Act No. 26-26 22 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, has authorized the
immediate removal of a child from his or her household pursuant to the
provisions of subsection (e) of this section, the commissioner, or the
commissioner's designee, shall not be required to provide advance
written notice of such removal to the child's attorney or guardian ad
litem.
Sec. 16. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section,
"personal emergency communication device" means a global
positioning system-enabled, wearable device that allows an individual
to contact local police by pressing a button or through another
mechanism.
(b) On and after January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Children and
Families shall (1) provide personal emergency communication devices
to employees of the Department of Children and Families who regularly
conduct visits to or evaluations of the homes of children under the
supervision of the commissioner and desire access to such devices
during such visits or evaluations, and (2) develop guidelines and a
training program for the use of such devices.
Sec. 17. (Effective July 1, 2026) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
the Department of Children and Families shall establish an urgent crisis
center, as defined in section 38a-477aa of the general statutes, in the city
of Stamford.
Sec. 18. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) There is established a
Child Welfare Policy and Oversight Committee. The committee shall
evaluate and make recommendations concerning (1) the operation,
policies and service outcomes of state agencies providing services
relating to and supporting child welfare in the state, and (2) the efficacy
and continued operation of existing state-wide boards, committees and
councils charged with oversight and evaluation of child welfare
services.
Public Act No. 26-26 23 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
(b) The committee shall consist of the following members:
(1) Two members appointed by the speaker of the House of
Representatives, one of whom shall be a mental health professional
employed at an urgent crisis center, as defined in section 19a-179f of the
general statutes;
(2) Two members appointed by the president pro tempore of the
Senate, one of whom shall be a regional social worker supervisor
employed by the Department of Children and Families;
(3) Two members appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives, one of whom shall be a private provider of child
welfare services;
(4) Two members appointed by the majority leader of the Senate, one
of whom shall be a foster parent licensed pursuant to section 17a-114 of
the general statutes, as amended by this act;
(5) Two members appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives, one of whom shall be an expert in child welfare
employed by an institution of higher education in the state;
(6) Two members appointed by the minority leader of the Senate, one
of whom shall be a relative or fictive kin caregiver, as defined in section
17a-114 of the general statutes, as amended by this act, with whom a
child in the care and custody of the Commissioner of Children and
Families has been placed;
(7) The chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to children;
(8) The chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
Public Act No. 26-26 24 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
relating to appropriations;
(9) The Commissioner of Children and Families, or the
commissioner's designee;
(10) The Commissioner of Education, or the commissioner's designee;
(11) The Commissioner of Mental Health and Addiction Services, or
the commissioner's designee;
(12) The Commissioner of Developmental Services, or the
commissioner's designee;
(13) The Commissioner of Social Services, or the commissioner's
designee;
(14) The Commissioner of Housing, or the commissioner's designee;
(15) The Commissioner of Correction, or the commissioner's
designee;
(16) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, or the
secretary's designee;
(17) The Chief Court Administrator, or the Chief Court
Administrator's designee;
(18) The Probate Court Administrator, or the Probate Court
Administrator's designee;
(19) The Chief Public Defender, or the Chief Public Defender's
designee; and
(20) The Child Advocate, or the Child Advocate's designee.
(c) Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority. Members
of the committee shall serve without compensation.
Public Act No. 26-26 25 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
(d) The chairpersons of the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to children, or the
chairperson's designees, and the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management, or the secretary's designee, shall serve as cochairpersons
of the committee. Such cochairpersons shall schedule the first meeting
of the committee, which shall be held not later than sixty days after the
effective date of this section. The committee shall meet quarterly, and
more often upon the call of the cochairpersons. The cochairpersons may
designate subcommittees to carry out the functions of the committee.
(e) The committee shall complete its duties under this section in
consultation with one or more organizations that focus on relevant
issues regarding child welfare, including an independent institution of
higher education in the state. The committee may accept administrative
support and technical and research assistance from any such
organization.
(f) Not later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter until such
time as the committee is terminated pursuant to subsection (g) of this
section, the committee shall submit a report, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to children, concerning its evaluation and recommendations.
(g) On or after January 1, 2031, the committee may, upon making a
determination that its work is no longer necessary or beneficial to the
provision of services relating to and supporting child welfare in the
state, by majority vote of the committee, terminate.
Sec. 19. (Effective from passage) The Departments of Children and
Families and Emergency Services and Public Protection shall conduct a
joint study to identify ways to improve (1) communication between said
departments with respect to the provision of child welfare services, and
(2) existing policies and practices relating to the removal of children
Public Act No. 26-26 26 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
from such children's homes pursuant to sections 17a-101g, of the general
statutes, as amended by this act, and 46b-129 of the general statutes, as
amended by this act. Not later than January 1, 2027, the Departments of
Children and Families Emergency Services and Public Protection shall
jointly submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-
4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to children. Such report
shall include the departments' findings and recommendations for
improvements.
Sec. 20. (Effective from passage) The Department of Children and
Families and the Office of the Child Advocate shall conduct a joint study
to identify ways to improve department policies and practices to ensure
the immediate removal from an out-of-home placement made by the
Commissioner of Children and Families of any child who becomes a
victim of physical or sexual assault occurring in or as a result of such
out-of-home placement. Not later than January 1, 2027, the Department
of Children and Families and the Office of the Child Advocate shall
jointly submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-
4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to children. Such report
shall include the department's and office's findings and
recommendations for improvements.
Sec. 21. Section 46b-486 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The Department of Public Health may release information relating to
an acknowledgment of parentage to (1) a signatory of the
acknowledgment, (2) the child if such child is eighteen years of age or
older, (3) a guardian of the person whose parentage is acknowledged,
(4) an attorney representing a person to whom such information may be
released, (5) a court, (6) a federal agency, (7) an authorized
representative of the Department of Social Services, (8) an authorized
Public Act No. 26-26 27 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
representative of the Department of Children and Families, (9) the child
support agency of this state, (10) any agency acting under a cooperative
or purchase of service agreement with the child support agency of this
state, and (11) the child support agency of another state.
Sec. 22. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Notwithstanding the
provisions of subsection (a) of section 17a-101g of the general statutes,
following the third accepted report of child abuse or neglect pursuant
to sections 17a-101a to 17a-101c, inclusive, of the general statutes, or
section 17a-103 of the general statutes, in which (1) the child who is the
subject of the report, (2) a sibling, half-sibling, step-sibling or other child
residing in the same home as such child, or (3) any combination of
children described in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section, has been
identified as the subject of prior accepted reports during the previous
twelve-month period, the commissioner shall commence an
investigation as described in section 17a-101g of the general statutes, as
amended by this act. Such investigation shall not be conducted by any
employee of the Department of Children and Families who conducted
an investigation into an allegation of child abuse or neglect concerning
any child described in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section during the
previous twelve-month period. Nothing in this section shall (A)
preclude the commissioner from authorizing the removal of any child
from such child's surroundings pursuant to subsection (e) of section 17a-
101g of the general statutes, or (B) be construed to require the
department to assign a different employee to investigate any report of
child abuse or neglect concerning any such child made subsequent to
the completion of any investigation required pursuant to this section.
Sec. 23. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) On and after October 1,
2026, not later than one week following the release from a correctional
institution of a person sentenced to a period of parole or probation
following such person's conviction for a violation of section 53-20, 53-
21, 53-23, 53a-70c, subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 53a-86,
Public Act No. 26-26 28 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
section 53a-90a, sections 53a-196 to 53a-196f, inclusive, or section 53a-
196i of the general statutes, the Commissioner of Correction, or the
commissioner's designee, or the executive director of the Court Support
Services Division of the Judicial Branch, or the executive director's
designee, as applicable, shall notify the Commissioner of Children and
Families, or the commissioner's designee, if an individual under the age
of eighteen resides at the residential address to which such person was
released.
(b) (1) Upon receipt of a notification pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section, the Commissioner of Children and Families, or the
commissioner's designee, shall determine whether any individual
under the age of eighteen residing at such residential address is under
protective supervision, as defined in section 17a-93 of the general
statutes, or receiving protective services, as defined in section 17a-93 of
the general statutes. Not later than one week following a determination
that any such individual is under such supervision or receiving such
services, the commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, shall
conduct a visit to such address for the purpose of evaluating the safety
of any such individual. The commissioner, or the commissioner's
designee, shall conduct a visit to such home not less than monthly
thereafter, until such period of probation or parole ends or an individual
under the age of eighteen no longer resides at such address.
(2) The Commissioner of Children and Families, or the
commissioner's designee, shall notify the Commissioner of Correction,
or the commissioner's designee, or the executive director of the Court
Support Services Division of the Judicial Branch, or the executive
director's designee, as applicable, if no individual under the age of
eighteen residing at such residential address is under such supervision
or receiving such services. Upon receipt of such notification, and not less
than every three months thereafter until such period of probation or
parole ends or an individual under the age of eighteen no longer resides
Public Act No. 26-26 29 of 30

Substitute House Bill No. 5004
at such address, the Commissioner of Correction, or the commissioner's
designee, or the executive director of the Court Support Services
Division of the Judicial Branch, or the executive director's designee, as
applicable, shall inquire with such probationer or parolee concerning
the welfare of any individual under the age of eighteen residing with
such probationer or parolee.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 26, 2026
Public Act No. 26-26 30 of 30